Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-2139
Utilities district; payment to cities or villages; allocation.

A metropolitan utilities district shall pay to every city or village of any class, other than metropolitan, in which such district sells water or gas, or both, at retail, a sum equivalent to two percent of the annual gross revenue derived from all retail sales of water or gas, or both, sold by such district within the city or village, except that retail sales of gas shall not include the retail sale of natural gas used as vehicular fuel. Such sums shall be paid not later than the thirtieth day of January of the next succeeding year. Such cities or villages shall not levy or collect any license, occupation, or excise tax upon or from such district. All payments provided by this section shall be allocated by the district among the several utilities operated by it upon such basis as the district shall determine.

Laws 1967, c. 47, § 2, p. 179;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 14-1042;

Laws 1992, LB 746, § 39;

Laws 2014, LB867, § 5;

Laws 2019, LB476, § 2.

Revenue from sale of water and gas by metropolitan utilities district are not taxes and section created by L.B. 425 (Laws 1967) is constitutional. Evans v. Metropolitan Utilities Dist., 187 Neb. 261, 188 N.W.2d 851 (1971).

Cited but not discussed. Evans v. Metropolitan Utilities Dist., 184 Neb. 172, 166 N.W.2d 411 (1969).